Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 6 General Provisions
Subchapter 6

— Local Criminal Justice Coordinating Committees

12-6-601. Local criminal justice coordinating committees.

The General Assembly finds that the investment of state or federal funding for the operation of a crisis stabilization unit under the Behavioral Health Crisis Intervention Protocol Act of 2017, §20-47-801 et seq., necessitates efficient expenditure of the state or federal funds.

The General Assembly encourages the establishment of local criminal justice coordinating committees composed of local judges, local corrections officials, the prosecuting attorney, law enforcement officials, county officials, medical professionals, and mental health professionals.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 423, §
6.

Subchapter 7

— Law Enforcement Agencies in General

12-6-701. Confidentiality of certain law enforcement records — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Access a record” means to view a photograph or video recording or to listen to an audio recording;

“Custodian of the record” means a person identified by the governmental entity that possesses the record and is responsible for safeguarding and providing access to the record;

“Death of a law enforcement officer” means all acts or events that caused or otherwise relate to the death of a law enforcement officer who was acting in the course of his or her official duties, including any related acts or events immediately preceding or subsequent to the acts or events that caused or otherwise relate to the death;

(1)A record that depicts or records the death of a law enforcement officer is confidential and exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

(A)However, a family member of the deceased law enforcement officer may access a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

The access to a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section or other handling of a record described in subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be under the direct supervision of the custodian of the record.

A person or persons designated as the custodian of a record who knowingly violates this section upon conviction is guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 531, § 2.

Subchapter 2

— Rape Task Force

Subchapter 3

— Enforcement of Motor Vehicle Traffic Laws